Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 81, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 88, article 1, section 26, is amended to read: Subd. 81. Open Arms 500,000 For a grant to Open Arms of Minnesota to acquire deleted text begin items of capital equipment to be used for a new kitchen and nutrition counseling center in Ramsey County to expand access to medically tailored meals for Minnesotans with life-threatening illnessesdeleted text end new text begin capital equipment to be used in the kitchen and for HVAC improvements for the nutrition counseling center building in the city of Minneapolisnew text end . This appropriation is available for expenditures made on or after July 1, 2023. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end